Hawaii statutes.
§88-97 Return to service of a member who
has vested benefit status. If a former member who has a vested benefit
status as provided in section 88-96(b) returns to service before the
former member's retirement, the former member shall again become a member and
shall contribute for membership service as provided by the law in effect during
the member's reenrolled period of membership. Upon retirement, the member's
benefit shall be the benefit computed with the member's combined service
included under the formula in effect at the time of retirement. [L 1969, c 110,
pt of §1; am L 1982, c 165, pt of §2(15); am L 2005, c 58, §13]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next